Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-501
Act, how cited.

Sections 38-501 to 38-527 shall be known and may be cited as the Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology Practice Act.

Laws 2007, LB247, § 63;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 187.